Utah statutes.
78B-15-614.   Consequences of failing to submit to genetic testing.

(1)  An order for genetic testing is enforceable by contempt.

(2)  If an individual whose paternity is being determined fails to submit to genetic testing ordered by the tribunal, the tribunal for that reason may adjudicate parentage contrary to the position of that individual.

(3)  Genetic testing of the mother of a child is not a condition precedent to testing the child and a man whose paternity is being determined.  If the mother is unavailable or fails to submit to genetic testing, the tribunal may order the testing of the child and every man who is potentially the father of the child.

